Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.180

Rights and duties of licensees—Records, contents—Itemized charges.

(1) The licensee shall maintain complete records at all times with respect to all agricultural commodities handled, stored, shipped, or merchandised by him or her, including commodities owned by him or her. The department shall adopt rules specifying the minimum recordkeeping requirements necessary to comply with this section.

(2) The licensee shall maintain an itemized statement of any charges paid by the depositor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 613; 1983 c 305 s 34; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 24; 1963 c 124 s 18.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.